apertium-nob.proper-nob.dix
<pardef n="Les_no-cp__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_no-cp"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="'_case\-_no-cp"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cgguess__np" c="For generating forms that were 'analysed' by CG ">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="attr"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="init"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>        <r>-<s n="np"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="cp-guio"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cgguess"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Odd ones: -->
<pardef n="Jesu/s__np">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s-</l>        <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s-</l>        <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="cmp"/><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s-</l>        <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>s-</l>        <r>s<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Krist/us__np">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us-</l>       <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us-</l>       <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="cmp"/><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us-</l>       <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us-</l>       <r>us<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/><s n="cmp-split"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- These are used to force a character to be uppercase in generation: -->
<pardef n="Aa"><e r="LR"><i>a</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>A</l><r>a</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Bb"><e r="LR"><i>b</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>B</l><r>b</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Cc"><e r="LR"><i>c</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>C</l><r>c</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Dd"><e r="LR"><i>d</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>D</l><r>d</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ee"><e r="LR"><i>e</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>E</l><r>e</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ff"><e r="LR"><i>f</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>F</l><r>f</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Gg"><e r="LR"><i>g</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>G</l><r>g</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Hh"><e r="LR"><i>h</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>H</l><r>h</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ii"><e r="LR"><i>i</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>I</l><r>i</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Jj"><e r="LR"><i>j</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>J</l><r>j</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Kk"><e r="LR"><i>k</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>K</l><r>k</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ll"><e r="LR"><i>l</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>L</l><r>l</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Mm"><e r="LR"><i>m</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>M</l><r>m</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Nn"><e r="LR"><i>n</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>N</l><r>n</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Oo"><e r="LR"><i>o</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>O</l><r>o</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Pp"><e r="LR"><i>p</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>P</l><r>p</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Qq"><e r="LR"><i>q</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Q</l><r>q</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Rr"><e r="LR"><i>r</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>R</l><r>r</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ss"><e r="LR"><i>s</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>S</l><r>s</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Tt"><e r="LR"><i>t</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>T</l><r>t</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Uu"><e r="LR"><i>u</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>U</l><r>u</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Vv"><e r="LR"><i>v</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>V</l><r>v</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ww"><e r="LR"><i>w</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>W</l><r>w</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Xx"><e r="LR"><i>x</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>X</l><r>x</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Yy"><e r="LR"><i>y</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Y</l><r>y</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Zz"><e r="LR"><i>z</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Z</l><r>z</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Ææ"><e r="LR"><i>æ</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Æ</l><r>æ</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Øø"><e r="LR"><i>ø</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Ø</l><r>ø</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Åå"><e r="LR"><i>å</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Å</l><r>å</r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="Áá"><e r="LR"><i>á</i></e><e r="RL"><p><l>Á</l><r>á</r></p></e></pardef>


<pardef n="D"><e r="LR"><p><l>d</l><r>D</r></p></e><e r="RL"><i>D</i></e></pardef>
<pardef n="A"><e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>A</r></p></e><e r="RL"><i>A</i></e></pardef>


<pardef n="__np" c="sme-nob">
  <!--  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="acr"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_no-cp"/></e> -->
  <!-- acr or no, that is the question. It seems nno does not have acr, and also not bidix. -->
    <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_no-cp"/></e>
</pardef>

	</pardefs>

<e lm="des">	<i>des</i><par n="Les_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="los">	<i>los</i><par n="Les_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="las">	<i>las</i><par n="Les_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mac">	<i>Mac</i><par n="Les_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mc">	<i>Mc</i><par n="Les_no-cp__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jesus">	<i>Jesu</i><par n="Jesu/s__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kristus">	<i>Krist</i><par n="Krist/us__np"/></e>
<e lm="De franske Alper"><par n="D"/><i>e<b/>franske<b/></i><par n="A"/><i>lper</i><par n="Noreg__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stortingets presidentskap"><par n="Ss"/><i>tortingets<b/>presidentskap</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="DSF"><par n="Dd"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="FD"><par n="Ff"/><par n="Dd"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="FFR"><par n="Ff"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Rr"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="FO"><par n="Ff"/><par n="Oo"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="GLR"><par n="Gg"/><par n="Ll"/><par n="Rr"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="KS"><par n="Kk"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="Findus__np"/></e>
  <e lm="KF"><par n="Kk"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="NIBR"><par n="Nn"/><par n="Ii"/><par n="Bb"/><par n="Rr"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="NJFF"><par n="Nn"/><par n="Jj"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="OD"><par n="Oo"/><par n="Dd"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SEG"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ee"/><par n="Gg"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SF"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SFF"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SFP"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Pp"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SVT"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Vv"/><par n="Tt"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="TIL"><par n="Tt"/><par n="Ii"/><par n="Ll"/><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Ap"> <par n="Aa"/><par n="Pp"/><i/><par n ="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="EO"><par n="Ee"/><par n="Oo"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="EØS"><par n="Ee"/><par n="Øø"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="FC"><par n="Ff"/><par n="Cc"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="FMX"><par n="Ff"/><par n="Mm"/><par n="Xx"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="FN"><par n="Ff"/><par n="Nn"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="GB"><par n="Gg"/><par n="Bb"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="HIV"><par n="Hh"/><par n="Ii"/><par n="Vv"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="IKT"><par n="Ii"/><par n="Kk"/><par n="Tt"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="IPS"><par n="Ii"/><par n="Pp"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="KPK"><par n="Kk"/><par n="Pp"/><par n="Kk"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="LBD"><par n="Ll"/><par n="Bb"/><par n="Dd"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="LBT"><par n="Ll"/><par n="Bb"/><par n="Tt"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="MGP"><par n="Mm"/><par n="Gg"/><par n="Pp"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="MK"><par n="Mm"/><par n="Kk"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="NNS"><par n="Nn"/><par n="Nn"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="NOK"><par n="Nn"/><par n="Oo"/><par n="Kk"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SAS"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Aa"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SDR"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Dd"/><par n="Rr"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SDS"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Dd"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SFS"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SGP"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Gg"/><par n="Pp"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SGS"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Gg"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SHL"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Hh"/><par n="Ll"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SK"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Kk"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SLF"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ll"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SNF"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Nn"/><par n="Ff"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SR"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Rr"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SSG"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="Gg"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SSL"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="Ll"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SV"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Vv"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SVL"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Vv"/><par n="Ll"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="SÁNAG"><par n="Ss"/><par n="Áá"/><par n="Nn"/><par n="Aa"/><par n="Gg"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="UKM"><par n="Uu"/><par n="Kk"/><par n="Mm"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e lm="VS"><par n="Vv"/><par n="Ss"/><par n="__np"/></e>
  <e c="sme-nob" r="RL" lm="NP_ACR_RE"><re>[A-Z][A-Z][A-Z]+</re><par n="__np"/></e>
